Tennessee, session 114, SB2577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-1013, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(g) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the bureau of TennCare shall not contract
with a pharmacy benefits manager if the pharmacy benefits manager has been
disciplined by the department of finance and administration or the department of
commerce and insurance.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 27, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A committee shall not contract with a pharmacy benefits manager if the
pharmacy benefits manager has been disciplined by the department of finance and
administration or the department of commerce and insurance.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 56, Chapter 7, Part 31, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A pharmacy benefits manager shall not contract for a service with a department,
agency, or entity of this state if the pharmacy benefits manager has been disciplined by
the department of finance and administration or the department of commerce and
insurance.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after that date.
SB2577
012385
- 1 -